Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
PROHIBITED INVESTMENTS AND LIMITATIONS

§431:6-401 Prohibited investments. In
addition to investments excluded under other provisions of this article, an
insurer shall not, except with the commissioner's approval in advance, invest
in or loan its funds upon the security of, or hold:

(1) Issued shares of its own capital stock, except
for the purpose of mutualization in accordance with section 431:4-502.

(2) Any investment or loan ineligible under section
431:6-105.

(3) Securities issued by an insolvent corporation.

(4) Any investment or security which is found by the
commissioner to be designed to evade any prohibition of this article. [L 1987,
c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next